Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-640
Identity fraud; penalty; restitution.

(1) A person
commits the crime of identity fraud if he or she without lawful authority:

(a) Makes,
counterfeits, alters, or mutilates any personal identification document with
the intent to deceive another; or

(b) Willfully and knowingly obtains, possesses,
uses, sells or furnishes or attempts to obtain, possess, or furnish to another
person for any purpose of deception a personal identification document.

(2)(a) Identity
fraud is a Class I misdemeanor. Any second or subsequent conviction under
this subdivision is a Class IV felony.

(b) A person found guilty of violating
this section may, in addition to the penalties under this subsection, be ordered
to make restitution pursuant to sections 29-2280 to 29-2289.

Laws 2009, LB155, § 12.